hu: Nyomtatási szín: Fekete; Cián; Magenta; Sárga; Egyéb
fr: Couleur d’impression: Noir; Cyan; Magenta; Jaune; Autre
zh-TW: 印刷顏色: 黑色; 青色; 洋紅色; 黃色; 其他
sl-SI: Barva tiskanja: Črna; Sinja; Škrlatna; Rumen; Drugo
en: Printing color: Black; Cyan; Magenta; Yellow; Other
fi: Tulostusväri: Musta; Syaani; Magenta; Keltainen; Muu
ru: Цвет печати: Черный; Голубой; Пурпурный; Желтый; Другой
vi: Màu in: Màu đen; Xanh lơ; Màu cánh sen; Màu vàng; Khác
ro-RO: Culoare de imprimare: Negru; Cyan; Magenta; Galben; Altele
da: Udskrivningsfarve: Sort; Cyan; Magenta; Gul; Andet
th: สีการพิมพ์: สีดำ; สีฟ้าอมเขียว; สีม่วงแดง; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
cs: Barva tisku: Černá; Tyrkysová; Tmavě purpurová; Žlutý; Jiné
hr-HR: Boja ispisa: Crna; Cijan; Magenta; Žuta; Ostalo
bg-BG: Цветен печат: Черен; Циан; Магента; Жълт; Други
pl: Kolor druku: Czarny; Cyjan; purpurowy; Żółty; Inne
lt-LT: Spausdinimo spalva: Juoda; Žydra; Rausvai raudona; Geltona; Kita
ko: 인쇄 색상: 검은색; 청록색; 마젠타; 옐로우; 기타
nl: Printkleur: Zwart; Cyaan; Magenta; Geel; Andere
zh-CN: 印刷颜色: 黑色; 青色; 洋红色; 黄色; 其他
pt-BR: Cor da impressão: Preto; Ciano; Magenta; Amarela; Outro
sv: Utskriftsfärg: Svart; Cyan; Magenta; Gul; Övrigt
sk-SK: Farba tlače: Čierny; Azúrový; Purpurový; Žltý; Iné
tr: Baskı Rengi: Siyah; Camgöbeği; Magenta; Sarı; Diğer
pt-PT: Impressão a cores: Preto; Ciano; Magenta; Amarelo; Outro
el: Χρώμα εκτύπωσης: Μαύρο; Κυανό; Φούξια; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
es: Color de impresión: Negro; Cian; Magenta; Amarillo; Otros
nb: Utskriftsfarge: Sort; Cyan; Magenta; Gul; Annet
de: Druckfarbe: Schwarz; Cyan; Magenta; Gelb; Sonstiges
ja: 印刷カラー: ブラック; シアン; マゼンタ; イエロー; その他
it: Colori di stampa: Nero; Ciano; Magenta; Giallo; Altro